Utah statutes.
78B-2-201.   Actions by the state.
The state may not bring an action against any person for or with respect to
any real property, its issues or profits, based upon the state's right or
title to the real property, unless:
(1)  the right or title to the property accrued within seven years before any
action or other proceeding is commenced; or
(2)  the state or those from whom it claims received all or a portion of the
rents and profits from the real property within the immediately preceding
seven years.
